Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4629
Power to contract: Presently exercisable power of appointment.

A powerholder of a presently exercisable power of appointment may contract:

(1) not to exercise the power; or

(2) to exercise the power if the contract when made does not confer a benefit on an impermissible appointee.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 52.